Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2282.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Any provision of a covenant, condition or restriction
that restricts any real property owned by a state educational institution, as
defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments thereto: (1) To be used only for
single-family residence purposes; or (2) from being used for any purpose
other than a single-family residence and contains discriminatory
provisions to restrict ownership or tenancy by race is hereby declared to be
against public policy, and such provisions, and any additional
amendments, covenants or conditions related thereto, shall be void and
unenforceable.
(b) The provisions of this section shall apply to any covenant,
condition or restriction, including any amendments or supplements thereto,
established between January 1, 1948, and December 31, 1958.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.